Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.740

Inspection or grading of commodities—File samples, retention.

From all commodities inspected, samples may be drawn, which samples, unless returned by agreement to the applicant, shall become the property of the state and subject to disposition by the department. Upon request the department may transmit a portion of such samples to interested parties upon payment of a reasonable fee set by regulation. Official state file samples shall be retained for periods prescribed by state or federal regulation.

[ 1989 c 354 s 49; 1963 c 124 s 41. Formerly RCW 22.09.410.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.